District of Columbia statutes.
24-710

Periodic examination of released patients.

(a)

For 2 years after his release, the patient shall report to the Mayor at such times and places as required, for a physical examination to determine whether the patient has again become a drug user. If the Mayor determines that the person examined is a drug user, he shall then order the patient into an institution in accordance with the provisions of §§ 24-701 to 24-711.

(b)

Upon the failure of any patient to report in accordance with the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, the United States Attorney for the District of Columbia shall be notified of such failure, and a statement of such failure to report shall be filed with the court. The court shall issue an attachment for the patient and order him confined forthwith for examination and such further action as the court may deem necessary and proper under the provisions of §§ 24-701 to 24-711.

June 24, 1953, 67 Stat. 79, ch. 149, § 11
July 24, 1956, 70 Stat. 611, ch. 676, title I, § 101
This section is referenced in § 24-709.
1981 Ed., § 24-610.
1973 Ed., § 24-610.
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.